New York, session 2025-2026, A7650.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 4 of section 44 of the judiciary law, as added 2 by chapter 156 of the laws of 1978, is amended to read as follows: 3 4. If in the course of an investigation, the commission determines 4 that a hearing is warranted it shall direct that a formal written 5 complaint signed and verified by the administrator be drawn and served 6 upon the judge involved, either personally or by certified mail, return 7 receipt requested. The judge shall file a written answer to the [the] 8 formal written complaint with the commission within twenty days of such 9 service. The formal written complaint and answer, and the record of 10 proceedings thereafter, including the hearing and any proceedings before 11 the commission, shall be public. If, upon receipt of the answer, or upon 12 expiration of the time to answer, the commission shall direct that a 13 hearing be held with respect to the formal written complaint, the judge 14 involved shall be notified in writing of the date of the hearing either 15 personally, at least twenty days prior thereto, or by certified mail, 16 return receipt requested, at least twenty-two days prior thereto. Upon 17 the written request of the judge, the commission shall, at least five 18 days prior to the hearing or any adjourned date thereof, make available 19 to the judge without cost copies of all documents which the commission 20 intends to present at such hearing and any written statements made by 21 witnesses who will be called to give testimony by the commission. The 22 commission shall, in any case, make available to the judge at least five 23 days prior to the hearing or any adjourned date thereof any exculpatory EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07982-04-5 A. 7650 2 1 evidentiary data and material relevant to the formal written complaint. 2 The failure of the commission to timely furnish any documents, state- 3 ments and/or exculpatory evidentiary data and material provided for 4 herein shall not affect the validity of any proceedings before the 5 commission provided that such failure is not substantially prejudicial 6 to the judge. The complainant may be notified of the hearing and unless 7 [he] the complainant shall be subpoenaed as a witness by the judge, 8 [his] the complainant's presence thereat shall be within the discretion 9 of the commission. [The hearing shall not be public unless the judge 10 involved shall so demand in writing.] At the hearing the commission may 11 take the testimony of witnesses and receive evidentiary data and materi- 12 al relevant to the formal written complaint. The judge shall have the 13 right to be represented by counsel during any and all stages of the 14 hearing and shall have the right to call and cross-examine witnesses and 15 present evidentiary data and material relevant to the formal written 16 complaint. A transcript of the proceedings and of the testimony of 17 witnesses at the hearing shall be taken and kept with the records of the 18 commission. 19 § 2. Section 45 of the judiciary law, as amended by chapter 35 of the 20 laws of 1983, is amended to read as follows: 21 § 45. Confidentiality of records. [1.] Except as hereinafter provided, 22 all complaints, correspondence, commission proceedings and transcripts 23 thereof, other papers and data and records of the commission shall be 24 confidential and shall not be made available to any person except pursu- 25 ant to section forty-four of this article. The commission and its desig- 26 nated staff personnel shall have access to confidential material in the 27 performance of their powers and duties. If the judge who is the subject 28 of a complaint so requests in writing, copies of [the] any pending 29 complaint, [the transcripts of hearings by the commission thereon, if 30 any] any documents made public pursuant to section forty-four of this 31 article, and the dispositive action of the commission with respect to 32 [the] any complaint resulting in a caution, admonition, censure, 33 removal, retirement, or resignation from judicial office, such copies 34 with any reference to the identity of any person who did not participate 35 at any such hearing suitably deleted therefrom, except the subject judge 36 or complainant, shall be made available for inspection and copying to 37 the public, or to any person, agency or body designated by such judge. 38 [2. Notwithstanding any provision in this section, the commission, 39 with the consent of the applicant, shall provide the record of any 40 proceeding pursuant to a formal written complaint against an applicant 41 for judicial appointment in which the applicant's misconduct was estab- 42 lished, any pending complaint against an applicant, and the record to 43 date of any pending proceeding pursuant to a formal written complaint 44 against an applicant for judicial appointment: 45 (a) to the commission on judicial nomination established by article 46 three-A of this chapter, with respect to applicants for appointment to 47 the court of appeals; 48 (b) to the governor with respect to all applicants whom the governor 49 indicates are under consideration for any judicial appointment; and 50 (c) to the temporary president of the senate and the chairman of the 51 senate judiciary committee with respect to all nominees for judicial 52 appointments which are subject to the advice and consent of the senate.] 53 The commission shall respond within fifteen days of a request for the 54 information provided for in this [subdivision] section. 55 § 3. Section 47 of the judiciary law, as added by chapter 156 of the 56 laws of 1978, is amended to read as follows: A. 7650 3 1 § 47. Resignation or retirement not to divest commission or court of 2 appeals of jurisdiction. The jurisdiction of the court of appeals and 3 the commission pursuant to this article shall continue notwithstanding 4 that a judge resigns or retires from office after a [determination of 5 the commission that the judge be removed from office has been transmit- 6 ted to the chief judge of the court of appeals,] formal written 7 complaint authorized pursuant to section forty-four of this article has 8 been served on the judge or in any case in which the [commission's 9 determination that a judge should be removed from office shall be trans- 10 mitted to the chief judge of the court of apppeals] formal written 11 complaint is served on the judge within one hundred twenty days after 12 receipt by the chief administrator of the courts of the resignation or 13 retirement of such judge. Any determination by the court of appeals 14 that a judge who has resigned or retired should be removed from office 15 shall render such judge ineligible to hold any other judicial office. 16 The chief administrator of the courts shall give written notice to the 17 commission of the resignation or retirement of any judge who is the 18 subject of an investigation within five days after [his] receipt there- 19 of. 20 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately.